North Carolina, session 2025, SB99.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-302.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-302.1. Salary.
(a) Prompt Payment. – Teachers shall be paid promptly when their salaries are due
provided the legal requirements for their employment and service have been met. All teachers
employed by any local school administrative unit who are to be paid from local funds shall be
paid promptly as provided by law and as State-allotted teachers are paid.
*S99-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Salary Payments. Payments Under Terms of Contracts. – State-allotted teachers shall
be paid for a term of 10 months. as follows:
(1) Extended-year contract teachers. – Teachers designated as extended-year
contract teachers as provided in G.S. 115C-306.1 shall be paid for a term of
11 months.
(2) Career and technical education teachers. – Except for career and technical
education agriculture teacher personnel positions as provided for in this
subsection, subdivision, State-allotted months of employment for career and
technical education to local boards shall be used for the employment of
teachers of career and technical education for a term of employment to be
determined by the local boards of education. Beginning with the 2018-2019
school year, career and technical education agriculture teacher personnel
positions serving students in grades nine through 12 shall be for a term of
employment for 12 calendar months. A local board of education may fund
these positions using any combination of State funds, local funds, or any other
funds available to the local board.
(3) 10-month term teachers. – All other teachers shall be paid for a term of 10
months.
Each local board of education shall establish a set date on which monthly salary payments to
State-allotted teachers shall be made. This set pay date may differ from the end of the month of
service. The daily rate of pay for teachers shall equal midway between one twenty-first and one
twenty-second of the monthly rate of pay. Except for teachers employed in a year-round school
or school, paid in accordance with a year-round calendar, or both, employed on an extended-year
contract, the initial pay date for teachers shall be no later than August 31 and shall include a full
monthly payment. Subsequent pay dates shall be spaced no more than one month apart and shall
include a full monthly payment.
Teachers may be prepaid on the monthly pay date for days not yet worked. A teacher who
fails to attend scheduled workdays or who has not worked the number of days for which the
teacher has been paid and who resigns, is dismissed, or whose contract is not renewed shall repay
to the local board any salary payments received for days not yet worked. A teacher who has been
prepaid and continues to be employed by a local board but fails to attend scheduled workdays
may be subject to dismissal under G.S. 115C-325 or G.S. 115C-325.4 or other appropriate
discipline.
Any individual teacher who is not employed in a year-round school may be paid in 12
monthly installments if the teacher so requests. The request shall be filed in the local school
administrative unit which employs the teacher. Local school administrative units shall fulfill this
requirement through a payroll deduction plan. The payment of the annual salary in 12
installments instead of 10 or 11 shall not increase or decrease the teacher's annual salary nor in
any other way alter the contract made between the teacher and the local school administrative
unit.
Notwithstanding this subsection, the term "daily rate of pay" for the purpose of
G.S. 115C-12(8) or for any other law or policy governing pay or benefits based on the teacher
salary schedule shall not exceed one twenty-second of a teacher's monthly rate of pay.
(b1) The State Board of Education shall maintain the same policies related to masters pay
for teachers that were in effect for the 2008-2009 fiscal year.
…
(c) Vacation. – Included within the 10-month term term of employment shall be annual
vacation leave at the same rate provided for State employees, computed at one-twelfth of the
annual rate for State employees for each month of employment. Local boards shall provide at
least 10 days of annual vacation leave at a time when students are not scheduled to be in regular
attendance. However, instructional personnel who do not require a substitute may use annual
Page 2 Senate Bill 99-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
vacation leave on days that students are in attendance. Career and technical education teachers
Teachers who are employed for 11 or 12 months may, with prior approval of the principal, work
on annual vacation leave days designated in the school calendar and may use those annual
vacation leave days during the eleventh or twelfth month of employment. Local boards of
education may adopt policies permitting instructional personnel employed for 11 or 12 months
in year-round schools to, with the approval of the principal, take vacation leave at a time when
students are in attendance; local funds shall be used to cover the cost of substitute teachers.
On a day that pupils are not required to attend school due to inclement weather, but employees
are required to report for a workday, a teacher may elect not to report due to hazardous travel
conditions and to take an annual vacation day or to make up the day at a time agreed upon by the
teacher and the teacher's immediate supervisor or principal. On a day that school is closed to
employees and pupils due to inclement weather, a teacher shall work on the scheduled makeup
day.
All vacation leave taken by the teacher will be upon the authorization of the teacher's
immediate supervisor and under policies established by the local board of education. Annual
vacation leave shall not be used to extend the term of employment.
Notwithstanding any provisions of this subsection to the contrary, no person shall be entitled
to pay for any vacation day not earned by that person.
…
(e) Teachers in Year-Round Schools. – Compensation for teachers employed in
year-round schools shall be the same as teachers paid for a 10-month term, other teachers
employed for the same number of months, but those days may be scheduled over 12 calendar
months. Annual leave, sick leave, workdays, holidays, salary, and longevity for teachers who are
employed at year-round schools shall be equivalent to those of other teachers employed for the
same number of months, respectively. Teachers paid for a term of 10 or 11 months in year-round
schools shall receive their salary in 12 equal installments.
…."
SECTION 2. Article 20 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-306.1. Extended-year teacher contracts.
(a) Definitions. – As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) Extended-year contract. – A contract providing for a term of employment of
11 months during the school year.
(2) IL teacher. – A teacher who holds a current North Carolina teaching license
in any of the following classes:
a. A three-year initial professional license.
b. A three-year limited license.
c. A one-year residency license.
d. A one-year emergency license.
(3) LPS teacher. – A teacher assigned by a local board of education to teach at a
school identified as low-performing as provided in G.S. 115C-105.37.
(4) Mentor teacher. – A teacher designated by the local board of education as a
mentor teacher. A mentor teacher may include a teacher in an advanced
teaching role pursuant to G.S. 115C-311.
(5) Veteran teacher. – A teacher who meets all of the following requirements:
a. Holds a current five-year North Carolina continuing professional
license for teaching.
b. Has at least six years of licensed teaching experience.
c. Is not an IL teacher, a mentor teacher, or an LPS teacher.
Senate Bill 99-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) Extended-Year Contracts. – Local boards of education shall, in awarding contracts to
teachers as provided in Part 3 of Article 22 of this Chapter, provide for extended-year contracts
as follows:
(1) Mandatory extended-year contracts. – The local board of education shall
award mandatory extended-year contracts to all IL teachers and all LPS
teachers. IL teachers and LPS teachers shall not be eligible to receive
10-month contracts.
(2) Optional extended-year contracts. – The local board of education shall offer
optional extended-year contracts as follows:
a. To mentor teachers in any year that the teacher is designated as a
mentor teacher.
b. To veteran teachers one year out of each three-year period the teacher
is employed by the local board.
Mentor teachers and veteran teachers may accept the extended-year contract
or may request and be awarded a 10-month contract.
(c) Designation of Mentor Teachers. – The local board of education shall annually
designate up to ten percent (10%) of those teachers employed by the local board as mentor
teachers. The local board of education shall, at a minimum, use the following criteria in
designating mentor teachers:
(1) Effectiveness in teaching and mentoring other teachers.
(2) Contribution to academic success of students.
The local board of education shall use annual teacher evaluations and other research-based
metrics in designating mentor teachers.
(d) Extended-Year Contract Duties. – A teacher who is awarded and accepts an
extended-year contract shall be assigned, at a minimum, the following additional job duties in
the eleventh month of employment:
(1) IL teachers. – IL teachers shall work with mentor teachers to improve
professional skills and increase classroom effectiveness. IL teachers shall
participate in professional development and support extended school year
instruction for students performing below grade level.
(2) Mentor teachers. – Mentor teachers shall do at least one of the following:
a. Mentor and teach other teachers, including IL teachers.
b. Provide professional development to other teachers.
c. Support extended school year instruction for students performing
below grade level.
d. Engage in other professional collaborations to improve student
success.
(3) LPS teachers. – LPS teachers shall be assigned additional job duties in the
discretion of the local board of education, which may include teaching an
extended school instructional year or engaging in high-quality professional
development.
(4) Veteran teachers. – Veteran teachers shall be assigned additional job duties
related to the provision of high-quality professional development in the
discretion of the local board of education."
SECTION 3. G.S. 115C-325.3(a) reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-325.3. Teacher contracts.
(a) Length of Contract. – A contract between the local board of education and a teacher
who has been employed by the local board of education for less than three years shall be for a
term of one school year. A new contract or renewal of contract between the local board of
education and a teacher who has been employed by the local board of education as a teacher for
three years or more shall be for a term of one, two, or four school years. A local board of
Page 4 Senate Bill 99-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
education may require by policy that the three years of employment be consecutive. A contract
or renewal of contract between the local board of education and a teacher shall include terms
permitting extended-year teacher contracts as provided in G.S. 115C-306.1."
SECTION 4. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of three hundred ten million dollars
($310,000,000) in recurring funds to provide extended-year teacher contracts to certain teachers
in accordance with G.S. 115C-306.1, as enacted by this act.
SECTION 5. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Senate Bill 99-First Edition Page 5